Washington statutes.
RCW 27.12.150

Intercounty rural library districts—Tax levies.

Funds for the establishment and maintenance of the library service of the district shall be provided by the boards of county commissioners of the respective counties by means of an annual tax levy on the property in the district of not more than fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value per year. The tax levy in the several counties shall be at a uniform rate and shall be based on a budget to be compiled by the board of trustees of the intercounty rural library district who shall determine the uniform tax rate necessary and certify their determination to the respective boards of county commissioners.

Excess levies authorized pursuant to RCW 27.12.222 and 84.52.052 or 84.52.056 shall be at a uniform rate which uniform rate shall be determined by the board of trustees of the intercounty rural library district and certified to the respective boards of county commissioners.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 7; 1955 c 59 s 8; 1947 c 75 s 7; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 8246-7.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective dates and termination dates—Construction—1973 1st ex.s. c 195: See notes following RCW 84.52.043.

Budget for capital outlays—Accumulation of funds: RCW 27.12.220.

Capital outlays—Bonds—Excess levies: RCW 27.12.222.